Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the fair and orderly marketing of fruits and vegetables in the state of Washington by establishing uniform grades and standards and by providing for the inspection of these products. This chapter is vital to protecting the national and international reputation of fruit and vegetable products grown and shipped from this state and protecting consumers from the sale of inferior and misrepresented fruits and vegetables. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the immediate and future health, safety, and general welfare of the citizens of this state.

[ 1998 c 154 s 1; 1963 c 122 s 1.]